New Mexico, session 2026, HB114.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO: SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION.--One million dollars ($1,000,000) is appropriated from the general fund to the board of regents of New Mexico state university for expenditure in fiscal year 2027 to enhance the buying power of federal supplemental nutrition assistance program participants through the double up food bucks program for the purchase of meat, nuts, eggs and fresh fruits and vegetables at New Mexico farmers' markets. Any unexpended balance remaining at the end of fiscal year 2027 shall revert to the general fund. .233239.1